bibisco/dictionaries/es_MX/es_MX.dic
abastar/PRSTVWX
abominar/HPSTVWX
abstraer/OQWY
acampanar/PSVWX
acechar/IPSTVWX
achicharrar/LPRSTVWX
acodalar/IPSVWX
acornear/PSTVWX
acuartar/PSVWX
adelgazar/IPSVWX
adrizar/IPSVWX
afiligranar/PSTVWX
agasajar/PRSTVWX
aguachar/PRSTVWX
ahojar/PSVWX
alagar/PSVWX
alcoholizar/HPRSTVWX
aliñar/PRSTVWX
almohadillar/PSVWX
alzaprimar/PSVWX
amanojar/PSVWX
amelgar/PSVWX
amordazar/IPSVWX
amusgar/PSVWX
aniquilar/HIPRSTVWX
apabullar/ILPSVWX
apeñuscar/PSVWX
apetecer/WX
apoquinar/PSVWX
apuñear/PSVWX
aricar/PSVWX
arrascar/PSVWX
arrodillar/IPRSTVWX
asenderear/PSVWX
asonar/LPSWX
atar/PRSTUVWX
atirantar/PSVWX
atrasar/IPRSTVWX
aunar/PRSTVWX
averiguar/HIPSTWX
azolvar/IPSVWX
baladronear/PSVWX
baraustar/PSVWX
barruntar/IPSVWX
beber/QTVWX
bizarrear/PSVWX
bolsear/PSVWX
bracear/PSVWX
bucear/PSVWX
cabestrear/PSVWX
calafatear/PSVWX
camaronear/PSVWX
cantusar/PSVWX
carcomer/VWX
castañear/PSTVWX
cecinar/PSVWX
certificar/HPRSTVWX
chapullar/PSTVWX
chirlar/PSVWX
chupar/PRSTVWX
civilizar/HPRSTVWX
coagular/HLPRSTVWX
colapsar/PRSTVWX
comercializar/HPRSTVWX
comprar/LPRSTUVWX
concurrir/VWX
conglutinar/PRSTVWX
consolar/HPRSTWX
contener/OQRTWX
contrapunzar/PSVWX
coordinar/HILNPSTVWX
corromper/OQRTVWX
crespar/PSVWX
cuadruplicar/HPSVWX
cumplir/INOQRTVWX
debutar/LPSVWX
deformar/HPRSTVWX
demostrar/HPRSTUWX
depredar/HPSVWX
desacertar/NPSWX
desagrupar/PRSTUVWX
desalmar/IPSVWX
desaparejar/PSVWX
desarrimar/PSVWX
desatraer/WY
desbarbillar/PSVWX
descabalgar/PRSTVWX
descapitalizar/HPRSTVWX
descastar/PSVWX
desclavar/PSVWX
desconcertar/PRSTWX
descoser/VWX
descular/PSVWX
desembarrar/PSVWX
desemparejar/PSVWX
desencantarar/HPSVWX
desenfaldar/PSVWX
desenjaular/PSVWX
desentalingar/PSVWX
desespañolizar/PSVWX
desflecar/PSVWX
desgramar/PSVWX
deshidratar/HPSVWX
desincrustar/LPSVWX
deslazar/IPSVWX
desmallar/PSVWX
desmerecer/IQTWX
desnormalizar/PSVWX
desorejar/IPSVWX
despanchurrar/PSVWX
despejar/PRSTVWX
despicarazar/PSVWX
despolarizar/HPSVWX
desrabar/PSVWX
destejar/PSTVWX
destrizar/PSVWX
desvariar/PSWX
detraer/WY
dictaminar/PSVWX
dirigir/OQRTUVWX
disentir/IWY
distraer/IOQWY
dopar/PRSTVWX
economizar/PSVWX
elucidar/HPSTVWX
embarbillar/PSVWX
emberrenchinar/PRSVWX
emborrullar/PRSVWX
embrosquilar/PSVWX
empalicar/PSVWX
empastar/PSVWX
empetatar/PSVWX
empotrar/IPSVWX
enalbardar/PSVWX
encabestrar/PSVWX
encambrar/PSVWX
encapar/PSVWX
encarrilar/PSVWX
encenagar/IPRSVWX
encimar/PSVWX
enconchar/PRSVWX
encuadrar/IPRSTVWX
endorsar/PSVWX
enflaquecer/IOQRTWX
engalanar/PRSTVWX
engazar/IPSVWX
engrifar/PSVWX
enhenar/PSVWX
enlajar/PSTVWX
enmaderar/HIPSVWX
ennegrecer/IWX
enrejar/PSVWX
ensamblar/PRSTUVWX
ensombrecer/OQRTWX
entercar/PRSVWX
entrecerrar/PSWX
entretejer/IQTVWX
entunicar/PSVWX
envidar/PSTVWX
equiponderar/PSVWX
escachar/PSVWX
escandalizar/PRSVWX
escarpar/PSVWX
esconzar/PSVWX
escullir/VWX
esmuñir/VWX
especificar/HPRSTUVWX
espolinar/PSVWX
esquivar/PRSTUVWX
esterar/PRSTUVWX
estraperlear/PSTVWX
esvarar/PSVWX
excomulgar/PSTVWX
explicar/HPRSTUVWX
extraviar/PRSTUWX
falsear/IPRSTUVWX
felpear/PSTVWX
fingir/INOQRTVWX
foguear/HPRSTUVWX
fracasar/PSVWX
fruncir/IVWX
galvanizar/HPRSTUVWX
garrochear/PSTVWX
glotonear/PSVWX
gramatiquear/PSVWX
guarecer/OQRTWX
hablar/LPRSTVWX
hartar/PRSTVWX
herir/IOQWY
hipotecar/PSTVWX
horadar/HPSTVWX
humear/PSVWX
iluminar/HPRSTUVWX
imposibilitar/PSVWX
inclinar/HPRSTVWX
indisciplinar/PRSVWX
ingerir/QWY
insacular/HPSTVWX
insumir/QTVWX
intoxicar/HPRSTVWX
ironizar/PSVWX
jaranear/PSVWX
jopar/PRSVWX
lacerar/HPRSTVWX
lancinar/LPSVWX
laurear/PSVWX
lexicalizar/HPRSTVWX
liquidar/HPRSTVWX
lograr/PRSTVWX
macar/PSVWX
majar/IPSVWX
maltear/PSTVWX
manguear/PSVWX
maravillar/PRSVWX
marrear/PSVWX
maular/PSVWX
melindrizar/PSVWX
merendillar/PSVWX
militarizar/HPSVWX
mitigar/HPSTVWX
molinetear/PSVWX
moquitear/PSVWX
mover/ILOQRTUWX
mundificar/HPSVWX
nasalizar/HPSVWX
nominar/HPSVWX
obrar/PSVWX
olfatear/PSVWX
orar/HPSVWX
ovalar/PSVWX
paletear/PSVWX
papeletear/PSVWX
parrafear/PSVWX
patrocinar/PSVWX
pellizcar/PSVWX
perfumar/PSVWX
perseguir/IOQWYZ
piafar/PSVWX
pintear/PSVWX
piular/PSVWX
platinar/PSVWX
pollear/PSVWX
porrear/PSVWX
precintar/PSVWX
preguntar/PRSTUVWX
preternaturalizar/PRSTVWX
profesionalizar/PSTVWX
prorratear/PSVWX
pulsar/HPRSTVWX
quebrajar/PSVWX
rabotear/PSVWX
ramonear/PSVWX
rasquetear/PSVWX
reagravar/HPRSTVWX
rebanar/PSVWX
rebuscar/IPSVWX
recaudar/HIPSVWX
reclasificar/HPRSTVWX
reconfigurar/HPRSTUVWX
rectificar/HPSTVWX
refirmar/PSVWX
rehacer/IOQRTWY
rellenar/PRSTUVWX
repagar/PSVWX
requemar/IPSVWX
responsar/PSVWX
retraducir/QTWX
revivir/VWX
ronzar/PSTVWX
rular/PSVWX
sachar/PSVWX
sarmentar/PSWX
setenar/PSVWX
sobrearar/PSVWX
socavar/HPSVWX
sonrojar/PRSTVWX
subvenir/WY
tabalear/PSVWX
tascar/PSVWX
terraplenar/PSVWX
toquetear/PSVWX
transfigurar/HPRSTVWX
trashumar/HPSVWX
tremer/VWX
trozar/PSVWX
urgir/VWX
velejar/PSVWX
visualizar/HPRSTVWX
zampuzar/PSVWX
